Tennessee, session 114, HB0453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-137, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b)
(1) Fire drills requiring full evacuation in educational occupancies where
such occupancies constitute the major occupancy of a building must be held at
least one (1) time every thirty (30) school days, with two (2) fire drills occurring
during the first thirty (30) full days of the school year. Additionally, four (4) fire
safety educational announcements must be conducted throughout the year. The
LEA will develop the content of the educational announcements. Fire drills
requiring full evacuation must be held at least once every two (2) months in
institutional occupancies where such occupancies constitute the major
occupancy of a building. A record of all fire drills, including the time and date,
must be kept in the respective school or institutional offices, and must be made
available upon request to the state fire marshal, or the state fire marshal's
deputies or assistants, for inspection and review.
(2) In the event that subdivision (b)(1) conflicts with a local, county, city,
or municipal law concerning the timeframe in which fire drills in educational
occupancies must occur, subdivision (b)(1) controls.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0453
002039
- 1 -